Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.220

Assessments—Right to request a refund.

(1) Of the assessments levied in RCW 16.67.120, a producer or owner of cattle from whom an assessment is collected, except for assessments collected at the first point of sale of green tag calves not subject to the assessment increases provided in RCW 16.67.120(2), has the right to request a refund of not more than $1.00 per head beginning July 1, 2024, not more than $1.50 per head beginning January 1, 2025, and not more than $2.00 per head beginning January 1, 2026. Refund requests must be mailed to the commission within 90 calendar days of the assessment.

(2) The commission must process the requested refunds on a calendar quarterly basis. Any refund request that is received by the commission less than 15 days from the end of the calendar quarter must be paid at the end of the next quarter.

[ 2024 c 155 s 3.]